Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1421
Commission; members; compensation; expenses.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but they shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual expenses incurred as necessary incident to such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 7, p. 2933;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 194.